Alabama, session 2026rs, HB531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
35 Section 1. Sections 40-21-83 and 40-21-103 of the Code
36 of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
37 "§40-21-83
38 There are specifically excluded from the gross receipts
39 or gross sales of a utility, all revenues derived from any of
40 the following:
41 (1) The furnishing of utility services which the State
42 of Alabama is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or
43 laws of the United States of America or the Constitution of
44 the State of Alabama.
45 (2) The furnishing of utility services which are
46 otherwise taxed under Sections 40-23-1 to 40-23-36, inclusive.
47 (3) Wholesale sales.
48 (4) The furnishing of electricity, natural gas, or
49 domestic water for use or consumption by, in, or for the
50 direct production, generation, processing, storage, delivery,
51 or transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic
52 water.
53 (5) The furnishing of electricity to a manufacturer or
54 compounder for use in an electrolytic or electrothermal
55 manufacturing or compounding process.
56 (6) The furnishing of natural gas to a manufacturer or
Page 2

(6) The furnishing of natural gas to a manufacturer or
HB531 INTRODUCED
57 compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
58 compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
59 energy.
60 (7) The furnishing of natural gas to be used by a
61 manufacturer or compounder to chemically convert raw materials
62 prior to the use of the converted raw materials in an
63 electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing or compounding
64 process.
65 (8) The use or consumption of electricity by an
66 incorporated municipality, a board, or corporation organized
67 under the authority of any incorporated municipality in
68 furnishing or providing street lighting or traffic-control
69 systems; the use or consumption of telephone services by an
70 incorporated municipality in providing fire alarm systems; and
71 the use or consumption of domestic water by an incorporated
72 municipality in extinguishing fires, explosions, or
73 conflagrations.
74 (9) The furnishing of natural gas or electricity for
75 use or consumption as fuel or energy in and for the heating of
76 poultry houses.
77 (10) The furnishing of utility services through the use
78 of a prepaid telephone calling card.
79 (11)a. The furnishing of natural gas or liquefied
80 petroleum gas for use or consumption as fuel or energy in the
81 construction of any public highway, road, or bridge.
82 b. This exclusion may only be claimed by a contractor
83 licensed by the State Licensing Board for General Contractors,
84 or a subcontractor working under the same contract, for use
Page 3

or a subcontractor working under the same contract, for use
HB531 INTRODUCED
85 pursuant to a written contract for and on behalf of a
86 governmental entity as defined in Section 40-9-14.1."
87 "§40-21-103
88 The storage, use, or other consumption of utility
89 services in the State of Alabama is hereby specifically
90 excluded from the tax herein levied:
91 (1) Whenever the State of Alabama is prohibited from
92 taxing such storage, use, or consumption under the
93 Constitution or laws of the United States of America or the
94 Constitution of the State of Alabama;
95 (2) Whenever any tax relating to the sale, use,
96 storage, or consumption of said utility services shall be
97 levied under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 23 of this
98 title, or under the provisions of Sections 40-23-1 through
99 40-23-36 or the Alabama Transaction Tax Act of 1992 if enacted
100 into law;
101 (3) Whenever the purchase of said utility services
102 shall have been at a wholesale sale;
103 (4) Whenever electricity, natural gas, or domestic
104 water shall have been used or consumed directly in or for the
105 production, generation, processing, storage, delivery, or
106 transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic water;
107 (5) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
108 other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
109 compounder in an electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing
110 or compounding process;
111 (6) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
112 other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
Page 4

other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
HB531 INTRODUCED
113 compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
114 compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
115 energy;
116 (7) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
117 other consumption is used by a manufacturer or compounder to
118 chemically convert raw materials prior to the use of such
119 converted raw materials in an electrolytic or electrothermal
120 manufacturing or compounding process;
121 (8) Whenever the sales price of said utility services
122 shall be included as a part of the gross receipts or gross
123 sales of a utility subject to the utility gross receipts tax
124 for the purpose of calculating the utility gross receipts tax
125 payable by said utility;
126 (9) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
127 other consumption is used or consumed in a process for the
128 isotopic enrichment of uranium and when said electricity is
129 purchased from a subsidiary corporation of the corporation
130 engaged in the isotopic enrichment of uranium; and
131 (10) Whenever utility services are furnished through
132 the use of a prepaid telephone calling card; and
133 (11)a. Whenever natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas
134 purchased for use or consumption is used or consumed as fuel
135 or energy in the construction of any public highway, road, or
136 bridge.
137 b. This exclusion may only be claimed by a contractor
138 licensed by the State Licensing Board for General Contractors,
139 or a subcontractor working under the same contract, for use
140 pursuant to a written contract for and on behalf of a
Page 5

pursuant to a written contract for and on behalf of a
HB531 INTRODUCED
141 governmental entity as defined in Section 40-9-14.1."
142 Section 2. (a)(1) The gross proceeds from the sale of
143 natural gas and liquefied petroleum gas for use in the
144 construction of any public highway, road, or bridge are exempt
145 from state sales and use taxes.
146 (2) This exemption may only be claimed by a contractor
147 licensed by the State Licensing Board for General Contractors,
148 or a subcontractor working under the same contract, for use
149 pursuant to a written contract for and on behalf of a
150 governmental entity as defined in Section 40-9-14.1.
151 (b) Any county or municipality may exempt the products
152 provided in subdivision (a)(1) from county or municipal sales
153 and use taxes under the same conditions provided in
154 subdivision (a)(2) and in accordance with Section 40-23-4.01,
155 Code of Alabama 1975.
156 Section 3. This act shall become effective on September
157 1, 2026.
Page 6